Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 3. Filing, Printing, and Distribution.

Collateral references. —

73 Am. Jur. 2d, Statutes, §§ 38, 39.

82 C.J.S., Statutes, §§ 72-78.

Sec. 24.08.300.
Delivery by governor.

When the governor has signed a bill or allowed it to become law without the governor’s signature, and when the governor has signed or noted resolutions, the governor’s office is to deliver the original enrolled copy of each law or resolution to the executive director of the Legislative Affairs Agency. The director shall sign for each bill and resolution, and when it has been photographed for duplication it shall be returned on receipt to the office of the governor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 37 ch 53 SLA 1973)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.35.010(a).
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.08.310.
Filing and effect.

The lieutenant governor shall file the original enrolled copies of all acts and resolutions and all executive orders having the effect of law that were submitted by the governor to the legislature and that were not rejected by it.
These documents shall be kept on file for at least two years.
All laws and executive orders having the force of law in the cumulative supplements to or replacement pamphlets for the Alaska Statutes are prima facie a part of the Alaska Statutes.

History.

(§ 7 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 39 ch 32 SLA 1971)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.35.010(b).
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.08.320.
Session laws.

The Legislative Affairs Agency is responsible for arranging for the production, editing, publishing, and distribution of the laws of each session.
The executive director shall have the slip law copies of the enrolled acts produced in sufficient quantity for one complete set to be provided each legislator pending the publication of supplements to the Alaska Statutes.
The commissioner of education and early development is to receive sufficient copies of the slip laws for official state distribution and the commissioner may charge for other distribution on the basis of production and handling costs.

History.

(§ 27 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 47 SLA 1961; am § 7 ch 126 SLA 1966; am § 40 ch 32 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 56 § 2 (1984))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.35.010(c).
Renumbered in 1985.

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 24.08.330.
Distribution of Alaska Statutes.

The Department of Education and Early Development is responsible for making official distribution of the Alaska Statutes to state executive branch agencies. The administrative director of the Alaska Court System is responsible for distribution to the court system. Distribution shall be made on the basis of written lists submitted by the department and the court system to the Legislative Affairs Agency within 90 days after the last day of each regular session of the legislature. A legislator is entitled to receive one set of the statutes for the member’s personal use, and this entitlement is restricted to the one set issued during a member’s entire legislative service. The commissioner of education and early development may deposit one set of the statutes in each free public library within the state. The right of sale to persons and organizations remains exclusively with the publisher.

Agencies receiving sets of the Alaska Statutes shall mark each volume or binder received “Property of the State of Alaska.”

History.

(§§ 4, 5 ch 16 SLA 1962; am § 41 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 38 ch 53 SLA 1973; am E.O. No. 56 § 3 (1984); am § 39 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 15 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 33 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.35.020.
Renumbered in 1985.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” and “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.